latin/orth_to_phon.xfscript
define digraphs [
    p h -> f .o.
    t h -> t .o.
    c h -> k .o.
    r h -> r 
    ];

define geminates [
    p p -> P .o.
    t t -> T .o.
    c c -> K .o.
    b b -> B .o.
    d d -> D .o.
    g g -> G .o.
    m m -> M .o.
    n n -> N .o.
    s s -> S .o.
    f f -> F .o.
    r r -> R .o.
    l l -> L .o.
    v v -> W 
    ];

define othercons [
     c -> k .o.
     v -> w .o. 
     q u -> k w .o.
     x -> k s .o. 
     n -> ŋ || _ [k|g]
    ];

define othervowels [
    a e -> E .o.
    o e -> E .o.
    e i -> I .o.
    e u -> e w .o.
    a u -> a w .o.
    u i -> u j .o.
    y -> i 
    ] ;

define glides [
    i -> j || .#. _ [a|e|i|o|u|A|E|I|O|U] .o.
    i -> j || [a|e|i|o|u|A|E|I|O|U] _ [a|e|i|o|u|A|E|I|O|U]
    ] ;

define vowelLength [
    i %: -> I .o.
    e %: -> E .o.
    u %: -> U .o.
    o %: -> O .o.
    a %: -> A 
    ];

regex [digraphs .o.
        geminates .o.
        othercons .o.
        othervowels .o.
        glides .o.
        vowelLength .o.
        %* -> 0
        ];

save stack orth_to_phon.xfst
